California statutes. Education Code
(c) The Commission on Teacher Credentialing shall establish a streamlined online process for
 local educational agencies to submit the prospective educator’s information, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) The prospective educator’s preparation program.

(2) The number of student teaching hours they will complete.

(3) The local educational agency or agencies where they are completing their student teaching.

(4) The schoolsite or schoolsites where they are completing their student teaching.

(5) Their desired credential.

(6) Evidence of their valid certificate or permit issued by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing that required professional fitness review.

(7) Their demographic information.

(d) (1) Commencing July 1, 2026, to the extent that funds are available for this purpose, up to one hundred twenty-five million dollars
 ($125,000,000) shall be available annually for the Commission on Teacher Credentialing to award stipends pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(2) Commencing July 1, 2027, to the extent that funds are available for this purpose, up to twenty-seven million five hundred thousand dollars ($27,500,000) shall be available annually for the Commission on Teacher Credentialing to award additional stipends pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (b).

(3) To the extent that demand for
stipends provided pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) exceeds the amount appropriated by the Legislature, the Commission on Teacher Credentialing shall prioritize applications on a first-come, first-serve basis.
 To the extent that the annual demand for stipends provided pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) is less than the annual amount appropriated by the Legislature, the Commission on Teacher Credentialing shall allocate any excess to stipends described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b).

(4) To the extent that demand for stipends provided pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) exceeds the amount appropriated by the Legislature, the Commission on Teacher Credentialing shall prioritize applications pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) based on the local educational agency’s unduplicated pupil count.

(e) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the Commission on Teacher Credentialing shall, on or before
 January 1, 2027, and each year thereafter, report to the Department of Finance and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature, regarding the state of the grant program, including, but not limited to, the number of prospective educators
 paid; their education preparation programs; their desired credential; the participating local educational agencies; the demographics of the participants in the program; the percentage of
 prospective educators who committed to a high-need field; and, to the extent applicable, all required data disaggregated by participants receiving an additional stipend pursuant to subdivision (d). The report submitted to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature shall be submitted consistent with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 68.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

44400.03.

(a) For 2025–26 fiscal year, the sum of three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the Commission on Teacher Credentialing to support
the base stipends provided pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 44400.02 of the Student Teacher Stipend Program established in this article. These funds shall be available for encumbrance until June 30, 2030.

(b) For the 2026–27 fiscal year, the sum of four hundred eight million dollars ($408,000,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the Commission on Teacher Credentialing to support the base stipends provided pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 44400.02 and the high-need field stipends provided pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 44400.02. These funds shall be available for encumbrance until June 30, 2032.

(c) For the 2025–26 fiscal year, of the amount appropriated in subdivision (a), up to six million dollars ($6,000,000) shall be available for the Kern County Superintendent of Schools to do the following:

(1) (A) Conduct a multimedia campaign beginning no later than April 1, 2026, and ending no sooner than July 1, 2028, to encourage students enrolled in California-based institutions of higher education and individuals employed in related fields to pursue a career in public school employment, become a credentialed teacher, and enroll in a program of professional preparation accredited by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing.

(B) In conducting the multimedia campaign, the Kern County
 Superintendent of Schools shall consult with the Commission on Teacher Credentialing, the Student Aid Commission, the department, and other educator credentialing interestholders to create and disseminate outreach to local educational agencies, institutions of higher education, and educator pipeline organizations, including classified employees, expanded learning employees, career technical education programs, and labor organizations. These multimedia outreach methods and materials shall include state and federal student aid and education loan repayment options for aspiring or current educators and other investments that benefit teachers, including, but not limited to, the Student Teacher Stipend Program,
including any additional stipend components authorized pursuant to this article, the Golden State Teacher Grant Program, and the National Board for Professional Teaching Standards Certification Incentive Program.

(2) (A) Develop a grants management system that could be utilized by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing to streamline the application and administration process for all teacher recruitment and retention programs that the Commission on Teacher Credentialing administers.

(B) The grant management system shall be available for public use no later than April 1,
 2026, for applications for the administration of the Student Teacher Stipend Program for the 2026–27 school year.

(C) The grant management system shall be made available for public use no later than December 31, 2026, for purposes of accepting applications for any additional stipend component authorized pursuant to this article for the 2026–27 school year.

(D) The grant management system shall include program administration for the National Board for
 Professional Teaching Standards Certification Incentive Program beginning no later than April 1, 2027.

(E) Notwithstanding any other law, any work executed pursuant to this paragraph shall be exempt from any provision of law relating to competitive bidding, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of Technology.

(3) Contract for a comprehensive independent evaluation of the state’s investments in educator recruitment and retention pursuant to this article and Section 44395, and report the evaluation to the Legislature on or before July 1, 2029, consistent with
 Section 9795 of the Government Code. This evaluation shall include the programs’ effectiveness in impacting prospective educator decisions to enroll in a student teaching program, increasing the number of individuals completing their student teaching program, increasing the number of individuals completing their student teaching programs in high-need credential areas, increasing the retention rates of educators after the first two years of employment, and the demographics of the participants in the programs.

(d) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriation made pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section
 41202, for the 2024–25 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section
 41202, for the 2024–25 fiscal year.

(e) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriation made pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the 2025–26 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2025–26 fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 69.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 14. Preparation Courses for Subject Matter Knowledge [44401. - 44401.]

44401.

(a) A school district, county office of education, or charter school that provides intensive examination preparation courses for the purpose of preparing multiple or single subject credential holders or education specialist credential holders to demonstrate subject matter knowledge by a subject matter examination approved by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing shall do both of the following:

(1) Ensure that the program meets the domains for subject matter understanding and skill adopted by the commission in the content area. 

(2) Provide general information to teacher participants on the requirements for adding a new credential type that may include, but need not be limited
 to, credential information available on the Internet Web site of the commission.

(b) A school district, county office of education, or charter school may contract with other entities, including the California subject matter projects administered by the University of California, for services to provide intensive examination preparation courses to assist teacher participants to prepare for taking commission-approved subject matter examinations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 202, Sec. 3.   (SB 751)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 16. Teacher Recruitment, Retention, and Support Grant Programs [44415. - 44418.]

44415.

(a) (1) For the 2018–19 fiscal year, the sum of seventy-five million dollars ($75,000,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the commission to establish the Teacher Residency Grant Program. This funding shall be available for encumbrance until June 30, 2023.

(2) Of the amount appropriated in paragraph (1), fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) shall be expended to provide one-time competitive grants to grant applicants to develop new, or expand existing, teacher residency programs that recruit and support the preparation of special education teachers.

(3) Of the amount appropriated in paragraph (1), twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) shall be expended to
 provide one-time competitive grants to grant applicants to develop new, or expand existing, teacher residency programs that recruit and support the preparation of bilingual education, science, technology, engineering, or mathematics teachers.

(b) (1) The commission shall make one-time grants to grant applicants to establish new or expand existing teacher residency programs. Grant recipients shall work with one or more commission-accredited teacher preparation programs and may work with other community partners or nonprofit organizations to develop and implement programs of preparation and mentoring for resident teachers who will be supported through program funds and subsequently employed by the sponsoring grant recipient.

(2) A grant applicant may consist of one or more, or any combination, of the following:

(A) A school district.

(B) A county office of education.

(C) A charter school.

(D) A regional occupational center or program operated by a joint powers authority.

(E) A nonpublic, nonsectarian school, as defined in Section 56034.

(c) Grants allocated pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be up to twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) per teacher candidate in the residency program of the jurisdiction of the grant recipient, matched by that grant recipient on a dollar-for-dollar basis. Grant program funding shall be used for, but is not limited to, any of the following: teacher preparation costs, stipends for mentor teachers, stipends for
 teacher candidates, and mentoring and beginning teacher induction costs following initial preparation.

(d) A grant recipient shall not use more than 5 percent of a grant award for program administration costs.

(e) A grant recipient shall provide a 100-percent match of grant funding in the form of one or both of the following:

(1) One dollar ($1) for every one dollar ($1) of grant funding received that is to be used in a manner consistent with allowable grant activities pursuant to subdivision (c).

(2) An in-kind match of mentor teacher personnel costs or other personnel costs related to the Teacher Residency Grant Program, provided by the grant recipient.

(f) For purposes of this section,
 the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Teacher residency program” is a grant applicant-based program that partners with one or more teacher preparation programs accredited by the commission and in which a prospective teacher teaches at least one-half time alongside a teacher of record, who is designated as the experienced mentor teacher, for at least one full school year while engaging in initial preparation coursework.

(2) An “experienced mentor teacher” for purposes of the Teacher Residency Grant Program is an educator who meets all of the following requirements:

(A) Has at least three years of teaching experience and a clear credential authorizing instruction of special education, or bilingual education, science, technology, engineering, or mathematics pupils, in the subject in which the experienced
 mentor teacher will be mentoring.

(B) Has a record of successful teaching as demonstrated, at a minimum, by satisfactory annual performance evaluations for the preceding three years.

(C) Receives specific training for the mentor teacher role, and engages in ongoing professional learning and networking with other mentors.

(D) Receives compensation, appropriate release time, or both, to serve as a mentor in the initial preparation or beginning teacher induction component of the teacher residency program.

(g) Grant recipients shall do all of the following:

(1) Ensure that candidates are prepared to earn a preliminary teaching credential that will authorize the candidate to teach special
 education, or bilingual education, science, technology, engineering, or mathematics upon completion of the program.

(2) Ensure that candidates are provided instruction in all of the following:

(A) Teaching the content area or areas in which the teacher will become certified to teach.

(B) Planning, curriculum development, and assessment.

(C) Learning and child development.

(D) Management of the classroom environment.

(E) Use of culturally responsive practices, supports for language development, and supports for serving pupils with disabilities.

(F) Professional
 responsibilities, including interaction with families and colleagues.

(3) Provide each candidate mentoring and beginning teacher induction support following the completion of the initial credential program necessary to obtain a clear credential and ongoing professional development and networking opportunities during the candidate’s first years of teaching.

(4) Prepare candidates to teach at the same grant recipient in which they will work and learn the instructional initiatives and curriculum of the grant recipient.

(5) Group teacher candidates in cohorts to facilitate professional collaboration among residents, and place candidates in teaching schools or professional development programs that are organized to support a high-quality teacher learning experience in a supportive work environment.

(h) To receive a grant, an applicant shall submit an application to the commission at a time, in a manner, and containing information prescribed by the commission.

(i) When selecting grant recipients, the commission shall do both of the following:

(1) Require applicants to demonstrate a need for special education, or bilingual education, science, technology, engineering, or mathematics, teachers and to propose to establish a new, or expand an existing, teacher residency program that recruits, prepares, and supports teachers to teach special education, or bilingual education, science, technology, engineering, or mathematics, in a school within the jurisdiction of the sponsoring grant applicant.

(2) Give priority consideration to grant applicants with one or
 more schools that exhibit one or more of the following characteristics:

(A) A school where 50 percent or more of the enrolled pupils are eligible for free and reduced-price meals.

(B) A school where at least 5 percent of the teachers are misassigned, as determined by the commission, or working on a short-term staffing permit, a provisional intern permit, or a waiver.

(C) A school that is located in either a rural location or a densely populated region.

(D) A school with a cumulative voluntary teacher attrition rate that exceeded 20 percent over the three preceding school years.

(j) A candidate in a teacher residency program sponsored by a grant provided pursuant to subdivision (b) shall
 agree in writing to either (1) work as an education specialist serving a caseload of pupils who receive special education services in a special education setting or (2) be placed in a bilingual education, science, technology, engineering, or mathematics assignment, in a school within the grant recipient that sponsored the candidate for a period of at least four school years beginning with the school year that begins after the candidate successfully completes the initial year of preparation and obtains a preliminary teaching credential. A candidate who fails to earn a preliminary credential or complete the period of the placement shall reimburse the sponsoring grant recipient the amount of grant funding invested in the candidate’s residency training. The amount to be reimbursed shall be adjusted proportionately to reflect the service provided if the candidate taught at least one year, but less than four years, at the sponsoring grant recipient. A candidate shall have
 eight school years to complete the four-school-year teaching commitment.

(k) If a candidate is unable to complete a school year of teaching, that school year may still be counted toward the required four complete school years if any of the following occur:

(1) The candidate has completed at least one-half of the school year.

(2) The employer deems the candidate to have fulfilled the candidate’s contractual requirements for the school year for the purposes of salary increases, probationary or permanent status, and retirement.

(3) The candidate was not able to teach due to the financial circumstances of the sponsoring grant recipient, including a decision to not reelect the employee for the next succeeding school
 year.

(4) The candidate has a condition covered under the federal Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 2601 et seq.) or similar state law.

(5) The candidate was called or ordered to active duty status for more than 30 days as a member of a reserve component of the Armed Forces of the United States.

(l) If a candidate is unable to complete their residency program or service requirement because of hardship, as defined by the commission, they may apply to waive any repayment obligation as described in subdivision (q).

(m) For purposes of administering the grant program pursuant to subdivision (b), the commission shall do all of the following:

(1) Determine the number of grants to be awarded and the total amount awarded to each grant applicant.

(2) Require grant recipients to submit program and expenditure reports, as specified by the commission, as a condition of receiving grant funds.

(3) Annually review each grant recipient’s program and expenditure reports to determine if any candidate has failed to meet the candidate’s commitment pursuant to subdivision (j).

(n) (1) If the commission is informed that more than 10 percent of a grant recipient’s sponsored candidates failed to earn a preliminary credential or meet the sponsored candidate’s commitment to teach pursuant to subdivision (j), the commission shall confirm with the grant recipient the applicable
 grant amount to be recovered from the
 grant recipient based on the number of candidates who failed to earn a preliminary credential or meet their teaching commitment above a 10-percent attrition rate.

(2) The amount to be recovered shall be adjusted proportionately to reflect the service provided if the candidate taught at least one year, but less than four years, at a public school in California.

(3) A candidate who obtains a waiver pursuant to subdivision (l) shall not count toward the 10-percent attrition rate.

(o) Upon confirming the amount to be recovered from the grant recipient pursuant to subdivision (n), the commission shall notify the grant recipient of the amount to be repaid within 60 days. The grant recipient shall have 60 days from the date of the notification to make the required repayment to the commission. If the grant recipient fails to make the required payment within 60 days, the commission shall notify the Controller and the grant recipient of the failure to repay the amount owed. The Controller shall deduct an amount equal to the amount owed to the commission from the grant recipient’s next principal apportionment or apportionments of
 state funds, other than basic aid apportionments required by Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution. If the grant recipient is a regional occupational center or a program operated by a joint powers authority that does not receive principal apportionment or apportionments of state funds, or a consortia of local educational agencies, the commission shall notify the Controller of the local educational agency where the candidate taught and the Controller shall deduct the amount owed from the applicable local educational agency’s next principal apportionment or apportionments of state funds, other than basic aid apportionments required by Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(p) An amount recovered by the commission or deducted by the Controller pursuant to subdivision (o) shall be deposited into the Proposition 98 Reversion Account.

(q) (1) Grant recipients may recover from a sponsored candidate who
 fails to earn a preliminary credential or complete the period of placement the amount of grant funding invested in the candidate’s residency training. The amount to be recovered shall be adjusted proportionately to reflect the service provided if the candidate taught at least one year, but less than four years, at a public school in California.

(2) Costs considered as part of a candidate’s residency training for purposes of this subdivision shall not include costs associated with a candidate’s compensation package, mentor compensation, or overall program administration and shall be limited to costs incurred that are specific to that candidate,
 such as tuition and materials.

(r) Grant recipients shall not charge a teacher resident a fee to participate in the Teacher Residency Grant Program.

(s) (1) Notwithstanding paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (a), the commission may allocate up to one million five hundred thousand
 dollars ($1,500,000) of the amount appropriated pursuant to subdivision (a) to capacity grants that shall be awarded on a competitive basis to local educational agencies or consortia, described in subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive, of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), partnering with institutions of higher education to expand or create teacher residency programs that lead to more credentialed special education, or bilingual education, science, technology, engineering, or mathematics, teachers.

(2) (A) The commission shall determine the number of capacity grants to be awarded and the amount of the applicable grants.

(B) Individual capacity grants shall not exceed seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) per grant recipient.

(t) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriation made by subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the 2017–18 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIII B,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2017–18 fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 70.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2036, pursuant to Section 44418.)
-------------------------------------------

44415.5.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply for the Teacher Residency Grant Program:

(1) “Experienced mentor teacher” means an educator who meets all of the following requirements:

(A) Has at least three years of teaching experience and holds a clear credential in the subject in which the mentor teacher will be mentoring. For programs leading to the issuance of new PK-3 early childhood education specialist credentials, the mentor teacher must have at least three years of teaching experience in prekindergarten, transitional kindergarten, kindergarten, or any of grades 1 to 3, inclusive, and hold a clear multiple subject credential.

(B) Has a record of successful teaching as demonstrated, at a minimum, by satisfactory annual performance evaluations for the preceding three years.

(C) Receives specific training for the mentor teacher role, and engages in ongoing professional learning and networking with other mentors.

(D) Receives compensation, appropriate release time, or both, to serve as a mentor in the initial preparation or beginning teacher induction component of the teacher residency program.

(2) “Teacher residency program” is a grant applicant-based program that partners with one or more commission-approved teacher preparation programs offered by a regionally accredited institution of higher education in which a prospective teacher teaches at least one-half time alongside a teacher
 of record, who is designated as the experienced mentor teacher, for at least one full school year while engaging in initial preparation coursework.

(b) (1) For the 2021–22 fiscal year, the sum of three hundred fifty million dollars ($350,000,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the commission for the Teacher Residency Grant Program to support teacher residency programs that recruit and support the preparation of teachers pursuant to this section. This funding shall be available for encumbrance until June 30, 2026.

(2) Grant funding awarded pursuant to this section shall be expended by a grant recipient within five fiscal years of the fiscal year in which the grant was awarded.

(c) (1) The commission shall make grants to applicants to establish new teacher
 residency programs, or expand, strengthen, or improve access to existing teacher residency programs that support either of the following:

(A) Designated shortage fields, including, but not limited to, special education, bilingual education, science, computer science, technology, engineering, mathematics, transitional kindergarten, or kindergarten, school counselors, and any other fields identified by the commission based on an annual analysis of state and regional hiring and vacancy data.

(B) Local efforts to recruit, develop support systems for, provide outreach and communication strategies to, and retain a diverse teacher workforce that reflects a local educational agency community’s diversity.

(2) Grant recipients shall work with one or more commission-accredited teacher preparation programs and may work with
 other community partners or nonprofit organizations to develop and implement programs of preparation and mentoring for resident teachers who will be supported through program funds and subsequently employed by the sponsoring grant recipient.

(3) A grant applicant may consist of one or more, or any combination, of the following:

(A) A school district.

(B) A county office of education.

(C) A charter school.

(D) A regional occupational center or program operated by a joint powers authority or a county office of education.

(d) Grants allocated pursuant to subdivision (c) shall be up to forty thousand dollars ($40,000) per teacher
 candidate in the residency program of the jurisdiction of the grant recipient, matched by that grant recipient at a rate of 80 percent of the first twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) of the grant amount received per participant, as described in subdivision (f). Residents are also eligible for other forms of federal, state, and local educational agency financial assistance to support the cost of their preparation. Grant program funding shall be used for, but is not limited to, any of the following:

(1) Teacher preparation costs.

(2) Stipends for mentor teachers, including, but not limited to, housing stipends.

(3) Residency program staff costs.

(4) Mentoring and beginning teacher induction costs following initial preparation.

(5) Compensation for residents.

(e) A grant recipient shall not use more than 5 percent of a grant award for program administration costs.

(f) A grant recipient shall provide a match of grant funding in the form of one or both of the following:

(1) Eighty cents ($0.80) for every one dollar ($1) of the first twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) in grant funding received per participant, to be used in a manner consistent with allowable grant activities pursuant to subdivision (d).

(2) An in-kind match of program director personnel costs, mentor teacher personnel costs, resident compensation costs, or other personnel costs related to the Teacher Residency Grant Program, provided by the grant
 recipient.

(g) Grant recipients shall do all of the following:

(1) Ensure that candidates are prepared to earn a preliminary teaching credential, including a PK-3 early childhood education specialist credential, in furtherance of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) upon completion of the program.

(2) Ensure that candidates are provided instruction in all of the following:

(A) Teaching the content area or areas in which the teacher will become certified to teach.

(B) Planning, curriculum development, and assessment.

(C) Learning and child development.

(D) Management
 of the classroom environment.

(E) Use of culturally responsive practices, supports for language development, and supports for serving pupils with disabilities.

(F) Professional responsibilities, including interaction with families and colleagues.

(3) Provide each candidate mentoring and beginning teacher induction support following the completion of the initial credential program necessary to obtain a clear credential and ongoing professional development and networking opportunities during the candidate’s first years of teaching at no cost to the candidate.

(4) Prepare candidates to teach in a school within the jurisdiction of the grant recipient in which they will work and learn the instructional initiatives and curriculum of the grant recipient.

(5) Group teacher candidates in cohorts to facilitate professional collaboration among residents, and ensure candidates are enrolled in a teaching school or professional development program that is organized to support a high-quality teacher learning experience in a supportive work environment.

(6) (A) For grants awarded during and after the 2023–24 fiscal year, provide a minimum compensation package, which may include, but is not limited to, a living stipend or wages for employment of no less than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) per candidate. Nothing in this section precludes a grant recipient from providing a larger compensation package to candidates, and grant recipients are encouraged to provide a compensation package to residents that is similar to the grant recipient’s compensation of school staff with comparable duties.

(B) To the extent a grant recipient received an award of up to twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) per candidate before the 2023–24 fiscal year and is serving candidates during and after the 2023–24 school year with that award, and commits to providing the minimum compensation package to those candidates, the grant recipient may submit the number of those candidates and associated per-resident award to the commission for an additional per-resident allocation for a combined per-resident total of up to forty thousand dollars ($40,000).

(h) To receive a grant, an applicant shall submit an application to the commission at a time, in a manner, and containing information prescribed by the commission.

(i) When selecting grant recipients, the commission shall do both of the following:

(1) Require applicants to demonstrate a need for teachers in one or more designated shortage fields or for the purposes described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), and to propose to establish a new, or expand, strengthen, or improve access to an existing, teacher residency program that recruits, prepares, and supports teachers to teach in either one or more such fields or in furtherance of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) in a school within the jurisdiction of the sponsoring grant applicant.

(2) Give priority consideration to grant applicants who demonstrate a commitment to increasing diversity in the teaching workforce, have a higher percentage than other applicants of unduplicated pupils, as defined in Section 42238.02, and have one or more schools that exhibit one or both of the following characteristics:

(A) A school where 50 percent or more of the enrolled pupils are eligible for free or reduced-price meals.

(B) A school that is located in either a rural location or a densely populated region.

(j) (1) A candidate in a teacher residency program sponsored by a grant provided pursuant to subdivision (c) shall agree in writing to serve in a school within the jurisdiction of the grant recipient that sponsored the candidate or another public school in California for a period of at least four school years beginning with the school year that begins after the candidate successfully completes the initial year of preparation and obtains a preliminary teaching credential, including a PK-3 early childhood education specialist credential. The candidate shall also commit in the written agreement to annually
 reporting to their sponsoring local educational agency where they are employed and their current contact information until they have completed their service requirement or eight years after completion of residency, whichever occurs first.

(2) A candidate shall have eight school years to complete the four-school-year teaching commitment.

(3) This subdivision shall apply to any current candidate or teacher that participates in a residency program under this section.

(k) If a candidate is unable to complete a school year of teaching, that school year may still be counted toward the required four complete school years if any of the following occur:

(1) The candidate has completed at least one-half of the school year.

(2) The employer deems the candidate to have fulfilled their contractual requirements for the school year for the purposes of salary increases, probationary or permanent status, and retirement.

(3) The candidate was not able to teach due to the financial circumstances of the sponsoring grant recipient, including a decision to not reelect the employee for the succeeding school year.

(4) The candidate has a condition covered under the federal Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 2061 et seq.) or similar state law.

(5) The candidate was called or ordered to active duty status for more than 30 days as a member of a reserve component of the Armed Forces of the United States.

(l) If a candidate is unable to complete their residency program or service requirement because of hardship, as defined by the commission, they may apply to waive any repayment obligation as described in subdivision (q).

(m) For purposes of administering the grant program pursuant to subdivision (c), the commission shall do all of the following:

(1) Determine the number of grants to be awarded and the total amount awarded to each grant applicant.

(2) Require grant recipients to submit program and expenditure reports, as specified by the commission, as a condition of receiving grant funds.

(3) Annually review each grant recipient’s program and expenditure reports to determine if any candidate has failed to meet their commitment pursuant to
 subdivision (j).

(n) (1) If the commission is informed that more than 10 percent of sponsored candidates in a local educational agency’s yearly program cohort failed to earn a preliminary credential or failed to meet their commitment to teach pursuant to subdivision (j), the commission shall confirm with the grant recipient the applicable grant amount to be recovered from the grant recipient based on the number of candidates who failed to earn a preliminary credential or meet their teaching commitment above a 10-percent attrition rate.

(2) The amount to be recovered shall be adjusted proportionately to reflect the service provided if the candidate taught at least one year, but less than four years, at a public school in California.

(3) A candidate who obtains a waiver pursuant to subdivision
 (l) shall not count toward the 10-percent attrition rate.

(o) Upon confirming the amount to be recovered from the grant recipient pursuant to subdivision (n), the commission shall notify the grant recipient of the amount to be repaid within 60 days. The grant recipient shall have 60 days from the date of the notification to make the required repayment to the commission. If the grant recipient fails to make the required payment within 60 days, the commission shall notify the Controller and the grant recipient of the failure to repay the amount owed. The Controller shall deduct an amount equal to the amount owed to the commission from the grant recipient’s next principal apportionment or apportionments of state funds, other than basic aid apportionments required by Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution. If the grant recipient is a regional occupational center or program operated by a joint powers authority that does not
 receive a principal apportionment or apportionments of state funds, or a consortia of local educational agencies, the commission shall notify the Controller of the local educational agency where the candidate taught and the Controller shall deduct the amount owed from the applicable local educational agency’s next principal apportionment or apportionments of state funds, other than basic aid apportionments required by Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(p) An amount recovered by the commission or deducted by the Controller pursuant to subdivision (o) shall be deposited into the Proposition 98 Reversion Account.
